Washington statutes.
RCW 16.68.160

Disposition of fees.

Funds collected for license fees and inspection fees shall be retained by the director to be used for the enforcement of this chapter.

[ 1949 c 100 s 11; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3142-11.]